de: Messersystem: Eingebautes Ober- & Untermesser; Messer auskuppelbar; Messer feststehend (nicht auskuppelbar); Abnehmbares Messer; Sonstige
zh-CN: 切刀系统: 内置上下刀; 刀片可分离; 固定式刀片（不可分离）; 可拆卸刀片; 其他
hu: Késrendszer: Beépített alsó és felső kés; A kés kikapcsolható; Fix kés (nem kapcsolható ki); Kivehető kés; Egyéb
fi: Veitsijärjestelmä: Sisäänrakennettu ylä- ja alaveitsi; Veitsi voidaan kytkeä pois päältä; Kiinteä veitsi (ei voi kytkeä pois); Irrotettava veitsi; Muu
sv: Knivsystem: Inbyggd övre och undre kniv; Kniven kan kopplas ur; Fast kniv (kan ej kopplas ur); Avtagbar kniv; Övrigt
cs: Systém nožů: Vestavěný horní a dolní nůž; Nůž lze odpojit; Pevný nůž (nelze odpojit); Odnímatelný nůž; Jiné
ru: Система ножа: Встроенный верхний и нижний нож; Нож можно отключить; Нож фиксированный (нельзя отключить); Съемный нож; Другое
pl: Układ noży: Wbudowany górny i dolny nóż; Możliwość odłączenia noża; Nóż stały (brak możliwości odłączenia); Zdejmowany nóż; Inny
es: Sistema de la navaja: Cuchillas superior e inferior integradas; La cuchilla se puede desacoplar; Cuchilla fija (no se puede desacoplar); Cuchilla extraíble; Otro
en: Knife system: Built-in upper & lower knife; Knife can be disengaged; Knife fixed (cannot disengage); Removable knife; Other
ro-RO: Sistem al cuțitului: Cuțit superior și inferior încorporat; Cuțitul poate fi decuplat; Cuțit fix (nu se poate decupla); Cuțit detașabil; Altele
lt-LT: Peilių sistema: Įmontuotas viršutinis ir apatinis peilis; Peilį galima atjungti; Peilis fiksuotas (negalima atjungti); Nuimamas peilis; Kita
da: Knivsystem: Indbygget over- og underkniv; Kniv kan frakobles; Kniv fastgjort (kan ikke frakobles); Aftagelig kniv; Andet
th: ระบบมีด: มีดบนและล่างในตัว; มีดสามารถปลดออกได้; มีดติดตายตัว (ปลดออกไม่ได้); มีดถอดออกได้; อื่นๆ
nb: Knivsystem: Innebygd øvre og nedre kniv; Kniv kan kobles ut; Fast kniv (kan ikke kobles ut); Avtakbar kniv; Annet
vi: Hệ thống dao: Tích hợp dao trên và dưới; Có thể tháo rời dao; Dao cố định (không thể tháo rời); Dao có thể tháo rời; Khác
ja: ナイフシステム: 上下刃内蔵; 刃の解除可能; 刃固定 (解除不可); 取り外し可能な刃; その他
bg-BG: Система на ножа: Вграден горен и долен нож; Ножът може да се изключва; Фиксиран нож (не може да се изключва); Сваляем нож; Друго
sk-SK: Systém noža: Vstavaný horný a dolný nôž; Nôž sa dá odpojiť; Pevný nôž (nedá sa odpojiť); Odnímateľný nôž; Iné
pt-BR: Sistema de faca: Faca superior e inferior embutidas; A faca pode ser desativada; Faca fixa (não pode desativar); Faca removível; Outro
tr: Bıçak sistemi: Dahili üst ve alt bıçak; Bıçak devreden çıkarılabilir; Bıçak sabit (devreden çıkarılamaz); Çıkarılabilir bıçak; Diğer
hr-HR: Sustav noža: Ugrađeni gornji i donji nož; Nož se može odvojiti; Fiksni nož (ne može se odvojiti); Uklonjivi nož; Ostalo
ko: 나이프 시스템: 내장형 상단 및 하단 나이프; 나이프 분리 가능; 나이프 고정(분리 불가); 탈착식 나이프; 기타
zh-TW: 刀具系統: 內建上下刀; 刀片可分離; 刀片固定 (無法分離); 可拆式刀片; 其他
sl-SI: Sistem nožev: Vgrajen zgornji in spodnji nož; Nož se lahko izklopi; Fiksen nož (se ne more izklopiti); Odstranljiv nož; Drugo
it: Sistema del coltello: Coltello superiore e inferiore integrato; Il coltello può essere disinnestato; Coltello fisso (non può essere disinnestato); Coltello rimovibile; Altro
nl: Messysteem: Ingebouwd boven- & ondermes; Mes kan worden uitgeschakeld; Mes vast (kan niet worden uitgeschakeld); Verwijderbaar mes; Anders
fr: Système de couteaux: Couteau supérieur et inférieur intégré; Couteau escamotable; Couteau fixe (non escamotable); Couteau amovible; Autre
pt-PT: Sistema de lâmina: Lâmina superior e inferior integradas; A lâmina pode ser desengatada; Lâmina fixa (não é possível desengatar); Lâmina removível; Outro
el: Σύστημα μαχαιριού: Ενσωματωμένο άνω & κάτω μαχαίρι; Το μαχαίρι μπορεί να αποδεσμευτεί; Σταθερό μαχαίρι (δεν μπορεί να αποδεσμευτεί); Αφαιρούμενο μαχαίρι; Άλλο